District of Columbia statutes.
31-634

Rules.

The Commissioner, pursuant to Chapter 5 of Title 2 [§ 2-501 et seq.], may issue rules to implement the provisions of this chapter.

June 20, 2012, D.C. Law 19-143, § 104, 59 DCR 4069
Because of the enactment by D.C. Law 11-159 of subchapter II of Chapter 37 of Title 35 [subchapter II of Title 31, 2001 Ed.], the preexisting text, including §§ 35-3701 through 35-3714 [§§ 31-701 through 31-714, 2001 Ed.], was designated as subchapter I.